District of Columbia statutes.
28-2901

Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“assignment” includes a written stock power, bond power, bill of sale, deed, declaration of trust or other instrument of transfer;

(2)

“claim of beneficial interest” includes a claim of any interest by a decedent’s legatee, distributee, heir or creditor, a beneficiary under a trust, a ward, a beneficial owner of a security registered in the name of a nominee, or a minor owner of a security registered in the name of a custodian, or a claim of a similar interest, whether the claim is asserted by the claimant, or by a fiduciary, or by any other authorized person on his behalf, and includes a claim that the transfer would be in breach of fiduciary duties;

(3)

“corporation” means a private or public corporation, association, or trust issuing a security;

(4)

“fiduciary” means an executor, administrator, trustee, guardian, committee, conservator, curator, tutor, custodian, or nominee;

(5)

“person” includes an individual, a corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or other legal or commercial entity;

(6)

“security” includes a share of stock, bond, debenture, note, or other security issued by a corporation which is registered as to ownership on the books of the corporation;

(7)

“transfer” means a change on the books of a corporation in the registered ownership of a security;

(8)

“transfer agent” means a person employed or authorized by a corporation to transfer securities issued by the corporation.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 672, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2901.
1973 Ed., § 28-2901.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Act for Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers.